Rhode Island, session 2025, SB518.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
WHEREAS, Pre-trial detention is one of the earliest points in the criminal justice system
and typically represents an individual’s first prospect of being incarcerated. The individual is
simply jailed while awaiting trial and not yet convicted of a crime, and still legally innocent; and
WHEREAS, The main purposes of pretrial detention are to secure the appearance at trial
of defendants who are flight risks and to protect the community from further criminal activity of
the person charged; and
WHEREAS, Defendants detained before trial represent over 75 percent of all jail inmates
in some parts of the country, with significantly higher rates of pretrial detention among black and
Hispanic individuals; and
WHEREAS, First‐time offenders accused of low‐level crimes, often spend months in
pretrial detention and face subsequent long‐term damage in the form of family separation and
adverse impacts on young children, work interruption, and loss of housing; and
WHEREAS, Many individuals are jailed pretrial because they can't afford money bail, and
others because prior probation or parole has resulted in the court placing a "hold" on their release.
The number of people in jail pretrial has nearly quadrupled since the 1980s; and
WHEREAS, There are a number of different types of pre-trial supervised release including
social workers and case managers from local organizations working with people to address barriers
to court attendance and connect them to social services, employment and location monitoring,

mental health treatment, and substance abuse treatment; and
WHEREAS, Balancing the greatest social benefit and/or risks to public safety, and return
on investment and use of taxpayer resources is necessary in order to provide the best data-driven
policy solutions; now, therefore be it
RESOLVED, That a special legislative commission be and the same is hereby created
consisting of eleven (11) members; three (3) of whom shall be members of the Rhode Island Senate,
to be appointed by the President of the Senate; one of whom shall be the RI Attorney General, or
designee; one of whom shall be a representative of the Judicial Branch, to be appointed by the Chief
Justice; one of whom shall be the Chair of the Rhode Island Parole Board, or designee; one of
whom shall be a warden of a Rhode Island prison, to be appointed by the President of the Senate;
one of whom shall be a representative from the Center for Health and Justice Transformation, to be
appointed by the President of the Senate; one of whom shall be the Director of the RI Department
of Children, Youth & Families, or designee; and two (2) of whom shall be persons formerly
incarcerated pre-trial in the State of Rhode Island, to be appointed by the President of the Senate.
In lieu of any appointment of a member of the legislature to a legislative study commission
or task force, created by a General Assembly resolution, the appointing authority may appoint a
member of the general public to serve in lieu of a legislator.
The purpose of said commission shall be to analyze the economic and societal benefits and
risks of pre-trial supervised release as an alternative to pre-trial detention, determine the impact of
reforms on Black Rhode Islanders, and provide recommendations to reduce the population and all
fees, costs and expenses incurred by pre-trial persons and the State.
Forthwith upon passage of this resolution, the members of the commission shall meet at
the call of the President of the Senate and organize, and shall select a Chairperson from among the
legislative members.
Vacancies in said task force shall be filled in like manner as the original appointment.
The membership of said task force shall receive no compensation for their services.
All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish such advice and information,
documentary and otherwise, to said task force and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable
by the task force to facilitate the purposes of this resolution.
The Joint Committee on Legislative Services is hereby authorized and directed to provide
suitable quarters for said commission; and be it further
RESOLVED, That said commission shall report its findings to the President of the Senate
LC000802 - Page 2 of 4

no later than February 5, 2026, and said task force shall expire on April 5, 2026.
========
LC000802
========
LC000802 - Page 3 of 4